dictionaries/cs/index.aff
SFX y Y 80
SFX y   ý           ejší/E   [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řejší/E  rý
SFX y   hý          žejší/E  [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šejší/E  chý
SFX y   ý           ější/E   [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtější/E cký
SFX y   ský         štější/E ský
SFX y   í           ější/E   ní
SFX y   ký          čejší/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           ejší/E   [^n]í
SFX y   ý           ejšího/E   [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řejšího/E  rý
SFX y   hý          žejšího/E  [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šejšího/E  chý
SFX y   ý           ějšího/E   [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtějšího/E cký
SFX y   ský         štějšího/E ský
SFX y   ký          čejšího/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           ejšího/E   [^n]í
SFX y   í           ějšího/E   ní
SFX y   ý           ejšímu/E   [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řejšímu/E  rý
SFX y   hý          žejšímu/E  [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šejšímu/E  chý
SFX y   ý           ějšímu/E   [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtějšímu/E cký
SFX y   ský         štějšímu/E ský
SFX y   í           ějšímu/E   ní
SFX y   ký          čejšímu/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           ejšímu/E   [^n]í
SFX y   ý           ejším/E   [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řejším/E  rý
SFX y   hý          žejším/E  [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šejším/E  chý
SFX y   ý           ějším/E   [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtějším/E cký
SFX y   ský         štějším/E ský
SFX y   í           ějším/E   ní
SFX y   ký          čejším/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           ejším/E   [^n]í
SFX y   ý           ejších/E   [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řejších/E  rý
SFX y   hý          žejších/E  [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šejších/E  chý
SFX y   ý           ějších/E   [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtějších/E cký
SFX y   ský         štějších/E ský
SFX y   í           ějších/E   ní
SFX y   ký          čejších/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           ejších/E   [^n]í
SFX y   ý           ejšími/E   [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řejšími/E  rý
SFX y   hý          žejšími/E  [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šejšími/E  chý
SFX y   ý           ějšími/E   [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtějšími/E cký
SFX y   ský         štějšími/E ský
SFX y   í           ějšími/E   ní
SFX y   ký          čejšími/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           ejšími/E   [^n]í
SFX y   ý           ejšíma/E   [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řejšíma/E  rý
SFX y   hý          žejšíma/E  [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šejšíma/E  chý
SFX y   ý           ějšíma/E   [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtějšíma/E cký
SFX y   ský         štějšíma/E ský
SFX y   í           ějšíma/E   ní
SFX y   ký          čejšíma/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           ejšíma/E   [^n]í
SFX y   ý           eji/E     [lsz]ý
SFX y   rý          řeji/E    rý
SFX y   hý          žeji/E    [^c]hý
SFX y   chý         šeji/E    chý
SFX y   ý           ěji/E     [bdmnptv]ý
SFX y   cký         čtěji/E   cký
SFX y   ský         štěji/E   ský
SFX y   í           ěji/E     ní
SFX y   ký          čeji/E  [^cs]ký
SFX y   í           eji/E   [^n]í

CIRCUMFIX Ů

PFX Ú Y 44
PFX Ú A a/Ů A
PFX Ú Á á/Ů Á
PFX Ú Ä ä/Ů Ä
PFX Ú Å å/Ů Å
PFX Ú B b/Ů B
PFX Ú C c/Ů C
PFX Ú Č č/Ů Č
PFX Ú D d/Ů D
PFX Ú Ď ď/Ů Ď
PFX Ú E e/Ů E
PFX Ú É é/Ů É
PFX Ú F f/Ů F
PFX Ú G g/Ů G
PFX Ú H h/Ů H
PFX Ú I i/Ů I
PFX Ú Í í/Ů Í
PFX Ú J j/Ů J
PFX Ú K k/Ů K
PFX Ú L l/Ů L
PFX Ú Ľ ľ/Ů Ľ
PFX Ú M m/Ů M
PFX Ú N n/Ů N
PFX Ú Ň ň/Ů Ň
PFX Ú O o/Ů O
PFX Ú Ó ó/Ů Ó
PFX Ú Ö ö/Ů Ö
PFX Ú P p/Ů P
PFX Ú Q q/Ů Q
PFX Ú R r/Ů R
PFX Ú Ř ř/Ů Ř
PFX Ú S s/Ů S
PFX Ú Š š/Ů Š
PFX Ú T t/Ů T
PFX Ú Ť ť/Ů Ť
PFX Ú U u/Ů U
PFX Ú Ú ú/Ů Ú
PFX Ú Ü ü/Ů Ü
PFX Ú V v/Ů V
PFX Ú W w/Ů W
PFX Ú X x/Ů X
PFX Ú Y y/Ů Y
PFX Ú Ý ý/Ů Ý
PFX Ú Z z/Ů Z
PFX Ú Ž ž/Ů Ž

SFX ý Y 12
SFX ý   0           ský/ÚŮ     .
SFX ý   0           ská/ÚŮ     .
SFX ý   0           ské/ÚŮ     .
SFX ý   0           ského/ÚŮ   .
SFX ý   0           skému/ÚŮ   .
SFX ý   0           ském/ÚŮ    .
SFX ý   0           ským/ÚŮ    .
SFX ý   0           skou/ÚŮ    .
SFX ý   0           ští/ÚŮ     .
SFX ý   0           ských/ÚŮ   .
SFX ý   0           skými/ÚŮ   .
SFX ý   0           skýma/ÚŮ   .

SFX í Y 23
SFX í   a           e          ia
SFX í   a           i          ia
SFX í   a           í          ia
SFX í   0           a          c
SFX í   0           ovi        c
SFX í   0           u          c
SFX í   0           em         c
SFX í   c           ka         c
SFX í   c           kovi       c
SFX í   c           ku         c
SFX í   c           kem        c
SFX í   0           a          [^i]e
SFX í   0           ovi        [^i]e
SFX í   0           m          [^i]e
SFX í   0           ho         y
SFX í   0           mu         y
SFX í   0           m          y
SFX í   0           ho         i
SFX í   0           mu         i
SFX í   0           m          i
SFX í   0           ho         é
SFX í   0           mu         é
SFX í   0           m          é

SFX é Y 10
SFX é   y           ého        y
SFX é   y           ému        y
SFX é   y           ým         y
SFX é   y           ý          y
SFX é   y           ém         y
SFX é   i           ého        i
SFX é   i           ému        i
SFX é   i           ým         i
SFX é   i           ý          i
SFX é   i           ém         i
